Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 11, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 20K), is amended to read as
follows:


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Section 20K. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or
after January 1, 2026, Class B6 shall include the following criminal
offenses:
1. Striking, tormenting, mistreating, or administering a
nonpoisonous desensitizing substance to a police dog or police
horse, as provided for in subsection A of Section 649.1 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
2. Interfering with the lawful performance of a police dog or
police horse, as provided for in subsection B of Section 649.1 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
3. Harming, torturing, injuring, disabling, or otherwise
mistreating or killing a service animal during the commission of a
misdemeanor or felony offense, as provided for in subsection D of
Section 649.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
4. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon a Department
of Corrections employee by a person in the custody of the Department
of Corrections, as provided for in subsection A of Section 650.2 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
5. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an employee of
a private prison contractor by a person incarcerated in an
institution operated by a private prison contractor, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 650.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. Aggravated assault and battery upon a Department of Human
Services employee or contractor, as provided for in subsection C of
Section 650.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
7. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an employee of
the Office of Juvenile Affairs by a person in the custody of the
Office of Juvenile Affairs, as provided for in subsection D of
Section 650.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
8. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon a medical care
provider, as provided for in Section 650.4 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
9. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an officer of
the court, witness, or juror, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 650.6 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
10. Aggravated assault and battery upon a school employee, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 650.7 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
11. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an employee
of a facility maintained by the Office of Juvenile Affairs, a
facility maintained by a private contractor, juvenile detention
center, or juvenile bureau, as provided for in Section 650.8 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
12. Throwing, transferring, or placing any feces, urine, semen,
saliva, or blood upon an employee of the state, a county, or a city,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

as p rovided for in Section 650.9 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
13. Medical battery, as provided for in Section 650.11 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title; and
14. Grooming, as provided for in Section 843.5 of this title;
and
15. Child endangerment, as provided for in Section 852.1 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.
B. Any person convicted of a Class B6 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the
corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 51.1a, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 51.1a. Any person convicted of rape in the first
degree, forcible sodomy, lewd molestation, grooming, or sexual abuse
of a child after having been convicted of either rape in the first
degree, forcible sodomy, lewd molestation, grooming, or sexual abuse
of a child shall be sentenced to life without parole.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 843.5, as
last amended by Section 8, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 843.5), is amended to read as follows:
Section 843.5. A. Any person who shall willfully or
maliciously engage in child abuse, as defined in this section,
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class A3 felony offense
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

puni shable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections not exceeding life imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a
county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine of not less
than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00), or both such fine and imprisonment.
B. Any person responsible for the health, safety or welfare of
a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in enabling child
abuse, as defined in this section, shall, upon conviction, be guilty
of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections not exceeding life
imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one
(1) year, or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both
such fine and imprisonment.
C. Any person responsible for the health, safety or welfare of
a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in child neglect,
as defined in this section, shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
Class B1 felony offense and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections not exceeding life
imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one
(1) year, or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both
such fine and imprisonment.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. Any parent or other person who shall willfully or
maliciously engage in enabling child neglect shall, upon conviction,
be guilty of a Class B1 felony offense and shall be punished by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections not
exceeding life imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a county jail not
exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00),
or both such fine and imprisonment.
E. Any person responsible for the health, safety or welfare of
a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in child sexual
abuse, as defined in this section, shall, upon conviction, be guilty
of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections not exceeding life
imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one
(1) year, or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both
such fine and imprisonment, except as provided in Section 51.1a of
this title or as otherwise provided in subsection F of this section
for a child victim under twelve (12) years of age. Except for
persons sentenced to life or life without parole, any person
sentenced to imprisonment for two (2) years or more for a violation
of this subsection shall be required to serve a term of post-
imprisonment supervision pursuant to subparagraph f of paragraph 1
of subsection A of Section 991a of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

unde r conditions determined by the Department of Corrections. The
jury shall be advised that the mandatory post-imprisonment
supervision shall be in addition to the actual imprisonment.
F. Any person responsible for the health, safety or welfare of
a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in child sexual
abuse, as defined in this section, to a child under twelve (12)
years of age shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class A1 felony
offense and shall be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections for not less than twenty-five (25) years
nor more than life imprisonment, and by a fine of not less than Five
Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00).
G. Any parent or other person who shall willfully or
maliciously engage in enabling child sexual abuse shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections not exceeding life imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a
county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine of not less
than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00), or both such fine and imprisonment.
H. Any person who shall willfully or maliciously engage in
child sexual exploitation, as defined in this section, shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Corr ections not exceeding life imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a
county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine of not less
than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00), or both such fine and imprisonment, except as
provided in subsection I of this section for a child victim under
twelve (12) years of age. Except for persons sentenced to life or
life without parole, any person sentenced to imprisonment for two
(2) years or more for a violation of this subsection shall be
required to serve a term of post-imprisonment supervision pursuant
to subparagraph f of paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 991a of
Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes under conditions determined by the
Department of Corrections. The jury shall be advised that the
mandatory post-imprisonment supervision shall be in addition to the
actual imprisonment.
I. Any person who shall willfully or maliciously engage in
child sexual exploitation, as defined in this section, of a child
under twelve (12) years of age shall, upon conviction, be guilty of
a Class A1 felony offense and shall be punished by imprisonment in
the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than
twenty-five (25) years nor more than life imprisonment, and by a
fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than
Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).
J. Any person responsible for the health, safety or welfare of
a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in enabling child
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

sexu al exploitation, as defined in this section, shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections not exceeding life imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a
county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine of not less
than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00), or both such fine and imprisonment.
K. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person
convicted of forcible anal or oral sodomy, rape, rape by
instrumentation, or lewd molestation of a child under fourteen (14)
years of age subsequent to a previous conviction for any offense of
forcible anal or oral sodomy, rape, rape by instrumentation, or lewd
molestation of a child under fourteen (14) years of age shall be
guilty of a Class A1 felony offense and shall be punished by death
or by imprisonment for life without parole.
L. Provided, however, that nothing contained in this section
shall prohibit any parent or guardian from using reasonable and
ordinary force pursuant to Section 844 of this title.
M. Consent shall not be a defense for any violation provided
for in this section.
N. Any person who shall willfully or maliciously engage in
grooming, as defined in this section, shall, upon conviction, be
guilty of a Class B6 felony offense punishable by imprisonment in
the custody of the Department of Corrections for not more than ten
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(10) years, by a fine not less than Ten Thousand Dollars
($10,000.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine. Except for
persons sentenced to life or life without parole, any person
sentenced to imprisonment for two (2) years or more for a violation
of this subsection shall be required to serve a term of post-
imprisonment supervision pursuant to subparagraph f of paragraph 1
of subsection A of Section 991a of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes
under conditions determined by the Department of Corrections. The
jury shall be advised that the mandatory post-imprisonment
supervision shall be in addition to the actual imprisonment.
O. Notwithstanding the age requirements of other statutes
referenced within this section, this section shall apply to any
child under eighteen (18) years of age.
O. P. As used in this section:
1. “Child abuse” means:
a. the willful or malicious harm or threatened harm or
failure to protect from harm or threatened harm to the
health, safety or welfare of a child under eighteen
(18) years of age by a person responsible for a
child’s health, safety or welfare, or
b. the act of willfully or maliciously injuring,
torturing or maiming a child under eighteen (18) years
of age by any person;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. “Child neglect” means the willful or malicious neglect, as
defined by Section 1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, of
a child under eighteen (18) years of age by a person responsible for
a child’s health, safety or welfare;
3. “Child sexual abuse” means the willful or malicious sexual
abuse of a child under eighteen (18) years of age by a person
responsible for a child’s health, safety or welfare and includes,
but is not limited to:
a. sexual intercourse,
b. penetration of the vagina or anus, however slight, by
an inanimate object or any part of the human body not
amounting to sexual intercourse,
c. sodomy,
d. incest, or
e. a lewd act or proposal, as defined in this section;
4. “Child sexual exploitation” means the willful or malicious
sexual exploitation of a child under eighteen (18) years of age by
another and includes, but is not limited to:
a. human trafficking, as provided for in Section 748 of
this title, if the offense involved child trafficking
for commercial sex,
b. trafficking in children, as provided for in Section
866 of this title, if the offense was committed for
the sexual gratification of any person,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. procuring or causing the participation of a minor in
child pornography, as provided for in Section 1021.2
of this title,
d. purchase, procurement or possession of child
pornography, as provided for in Section 1024.2 of this
title,
e. engaging in or soliciting prostitution, as provided
for in Section 1029 of this title, if the offense
involved child sex trafficking,
f. publication, distribution or participation in the
preparation of obscene material, as provided for in
Section 1040.8 of this title, if the offense involved
child pornography,
g. aggravated possession of child pornography, as
provided for in Section 1040.12a of this title,
h. sale or distribution of obscene material, as provided
for in Section 1040.13 of this title,
i. soliciting sexual conduct or communication with a
minor by use of technology, as provided for in Section
1040.13a of this title,
j. offering or transporting a child for purposes of child
sex trafficking, as provided for in Section 1087 of
this title, and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

k. child sex trafficking, as provided for in Section 1088
of this title;
5. “Enabling child abuse” means the causing, procuring or
permitting of child abuse by a person responsible for a child’s
health, safety or welfare;
6. “Enabling child neglect” means the causing, procuring or
permitting of child neglect by a person responsible for a child’s
health, safety or welfare;
7. “Enabling child sexual abuse” means the causing, procuring
or permitting of child sexual abuse by a person responsible for a
child’s health, safety or welfare;
8. “Enabling child sexual exploitation” means the causing,
procuring or permitting of child sexual exploitation by a person
responsible for a child’s health, safety or welfare;
9. “Grooming” means befriending and establishing an emotional
connection with a minor or a person responsible for the health,
safety, or welfare of a minor in order to lower the minor’s
inhibitions with the intent to engage the minor in:
a. sexual intercourse,
b. a lewd act or proposal,
c. the viewing of lewd material,
d. penetration of the vagina or anus, however slight, by
an inanimate object or any part of the human body not
amounting to sexual intercourse,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

e. sodomy, or
f. incest;
10. “Incest” means marrying, committing adultery or fornicating
with a child by a person responsible for the health, safety or
welfare of a child;
10. 11. “Lewd act or proposal” means:
a. making any oral, written or electronic or computer-
generated lewd or indecent proposal to a child for the
child to have unlawful sexual relations or sexual
intercourse with any person,
b. looking upon, touching, mauling or feeling the body or
private parts of a child in a lewd or lascivious
manner or for the purpose of sexual gratification,
c. asking, inviting, enticing or persuading any child to
go alone with any person to a secluded, remote or
secret place for a lewd or lascivious purpose,
d. urinating or defecating upon a child or causing,
forcing or requiring a child to defecate or urinate
upon the body or private parts of another person for
the purpose of sexual gratification,
e. ejaculating upon or in the presence of a child,
f. causing, exposing, forcing or requiring a child to
look upon the body or private parts of another person
for the purpose of sexual gratification,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

g. causing, forcing or requiring any child to view any
obscene materials, child pornography or materials
deemed harmful to minors as such terms are defined in
Sections 1024.1 and 1040.75 of this title,
h. causing, exposing, forcing or requiring a child to
look upon sexual acts performed in the presence of the
child for the purpose of sexual gratification, or
i. causing, forcing or requiring a child to touch or feel
the body or private parts of the child or another
person for the purpose of sexual gratification;
11. 12. “Permit” means to authorize or allow for the care of a
child by an individual when the person authorizing or allowing such
care knows or reasonably should know that the child will be placed
at risk of the conduct or harm proscribed by this section;
12. 13. “Person responsible for a child’s health, safety or
welfare” for purposes of this section shall include, but not be
limited to:
a. the parent of the child,
b. the legal guardian of the child,
c. the custodian of the child,
d. the foster parent of the child,
e. a person eighteen (18) years of age or older with whom
the parent of the child cohabitates, who is at least
three (3) years older than the child,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

f. any other person eighteen (18) years of age or older
residing in the home of the child, who is at least
three (3) years older than the child,
g. an owner, operator, agent, employee or volunteer of a
public or private residential home, institution,
facility or day treatment program, as defined in
Section 175.20 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
that the child attended,
h. an owner, operator, agent, employee or volunteer of a
child care facility, as defined in Section 402 of
Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes, that the child
attended,
i. an intimate partner of the parent of the child, as
defined in Section 60.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, or
j. a person who has voluntarily accepted responsibility
for the care or supervision of a child;
13. 14. “Sexual intercourse” means the actual penetration,
however slight, of the vagina or anus by the penis; and
14. 15. “Sodomy” means:
a. penetration, however slight, of the mouth of the child
by a penis,


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. penetration, however slight, of the vagina of a person
responsible for a child’s health, safety or welfare,
by the mouth of a child,
c. penetration, however slight, of the mouth of the
person responsible for a child’s health, safety or
welfare by the penis of the child, or
d. penetration, however slight, of the vagina of the
child by the mouth of the person responsible for a
child’s health, safety or welfare.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 991a, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 306, O.S.L. 2025 (22 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 991a), is amended to read as follows:
Section 991a. A. Except as otherwise provided in the Elderly
and Incapacitated Victim’s Protection Program, when a defendant is
convicted of a crime and no death sentence is imposed, the court
shall either:
1. Suspend the execution of sentence in whole or in part, with
or without probation. The court, in addition, may order the
convicted defendant at the time of sentencing or at any time during
the suspended sentence to do one or more of the following:
a. to provide restitution to the victim as provided by
Section 991f et seq. of this title or according to a
schedule of payments established by the sentencing
court, together with interest upon any pecuniary sum
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum, if the
defendant agrees to pay such restitution or, in the
opinion of the court, if the defendant is able to pay
such restitution without imposing manifest hardship on
the defendant or the immediate family and if the
extent of the damage to the victim is determinable
with reasonable certainty,
b. to reimburse any state agency for amounts paid by the
state agency for hospital and medical expenses
incurred by the victim or victims, as a result of the
criminal act for which such person was convicted,
which reimbursement shall be made directly to the
state agency, with interest accruing thereon at the
rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum,
c. to engage in a term of community service without
compensation, according to a schedule consistent with
the employment and family responsibilities of the
person convicted,
d. to pay a reasonable sum into any trust fund
established pursuant to the provisions of Sections 176
through 180.4 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes and
which provides restitution payments by convicted
defendants to victims of crimes committed within this

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

state wherein such victim has incurred a financial
loss,
e. to confinement in the county jail for a period not to
exceed six (6) months,
f. to confinement as provided by law together with a term
of post-imprisonment community supervision for not
less than three (3) years of the total term allowed by
law for imprisonment, with or without restitution;
provided, however, the authority of this provision is
limited to Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes when the offense involved sexual abuse or,
sexual exploitation, or grooming; Sections 681, 741
and 843.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes when
the offense involved sexual abuse or sexual
exploitation; and Sections 865 et seq., 885, 886, 888,
891, 1021, 1021.2, 1021.3, 1040.13a, 1087, 1088,
1111.1, 1115 and 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes,
g. to repay the reward or part of the reward paid by a
local certified crime stoppers program and the
Oklahoma Reward System. In determining whether the
defendant shall repay the reward or part of the
reward, the court shall consider the ability of the
defendant to make the payment, the financial hardship
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

on the defendant to make the required payment and the
importance of the information to the prosecution of
the defendant as provided by the arresting officer or
the district attorney with due regard for the
confidentiality of the records of the local certified
crime stoppers program and the Oklahoma Reward System.
The court shall assess this repayment against the
defendant as a cost of prosecution. The term
“certified” means crime stoppers organizations that
annually meet the certification standards for crime
stoppers programs established by the Oklahoma Crime
Stoppers Association to the extent those standards do
not conflict with state statutes. The term “court”
refers to all municipal and district courts within
this state. The “Oklahoma Reward System” means the
reward program established by Section 150.18 of Title
74 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
h. to reimburse the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation for costs incurred by that agency during
its investigation of the crime for which the defendant
pleaded guilty, nolo contendere or was convicted
including compensation for laboratory, technical or
investigation services performed by the Bureau if, in
the opinion of the court, the defendant is able to pay
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

without imposing manifest hardship on the defendant,
and if the costs incurred by the Bureau during the
investigation of the defendant’s case may be
determined with reasonable certainty,
i. to reimburse the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation and any authorized law enforcement
agency for all costs incurred by that agency for
cleaning up an illegal drug laboratory site for which
the defendant pleaded guilty, nolo contendere or was
convicted. The court clerk shall collect the amount
and may retain five percent (5%) of such monies to be
deposited in the Court Clerk’s Revolving Fund to cover
administrative costs and shall remit the remainder to
the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation to be
deposited in the OSBI Revolving Fund established by
Section 150.19a of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes
or to the general fund wherein the other law
enforcement agency is located,
j. to pay a reasonable sum to the Crime Victims
Compensation Board, created by Section 142.2 et seq.
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for the benefit
of crime victims,


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

k. to reimburse the court fund for amounts paid to court-
appointed attorneys for representing the defendant in
the case in which the person is being sentenced,
l. to participate in an assessment and evaluation by an
assessment agency or assessment personnel certified by
the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services pursuant to Section 3-460 of Title 43A of the
Oklahoma Statutes and, as determined by the
assessment, participate in an alcohol and drug
substance abuse course or treatment program or both,
pursuant to Sections 3-452 and 3-453 of Title 43A of
the Oklahoma Statutes, or as ordered by the court,
m. to be placed in a victims impact panel program, as
defined in subsection H of this section, or
victim/offender reconciliation program and payment of
a fee to the program of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00)
as set by the governing authority of the program to
offset the cost of participation by the defendant.
Provided, each victim/offender reconciliation program
shall be required to obtain a written consent form
voluntarily signed by the victim and defendant that
specifies the methods to be used to resolve the
issues, the obligations and rights of each person and
the confidentiality of the proceedings. Volunteer
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

mediators and employees of a victim/offender
reconciliation program shall be immune from liability
and have rights of confidentiality as provided in
Section 1805 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
n. to install, at the expense of the defendant, an
ignition interlock device approved by the Board of
Tests for Alcohol and Drug Influence. The device
shall be installed upon every motor vehicle operated
by the defendant, and the court shall require that a
notation of this restriction be affixed to the
defendant’s driver license. The restriction shall
remain on the driver license not exceeding two (2)
years to be determined by the court. The restriction
may be modified or removed only by order of the court
and notice of any modification order shall be given to
Service Oklahoma. Upon the expiration of the period
for the restriction, Service Oklahoma shall remove the
restriction without further court order. Failure to
comply with the order to install an ignition interlock
device or operating any vehicle without a device
during the period of restriction shall be a violation
of the sentence and may be punished as deemed proper
by the sentencing court. As used in this paragraph,
“ignition interlock device” means a device that,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 23
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

without tampering or intervention by another person,
would prevent the defendant from operating a motor
vehicle if the defendant has a blood or breath alcohol
concentration of two-hundredths (0.02) or greater,
o. to be confined by electronic monitoring administered
and supervised by the Department of Corrections or a
community sentence provider, and payment of a
monitoring fee to the supervising authority, not to
exceed Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) per month. Any
fees collected pursuant to this subparagraph shall be
deposited with the appropriate supervising authority.
Any willful violation of an order of the court for the
payment of the monitoring fee shall be a violation of
the sentence and may be punished as deemed proper by
the sentencing court. As used in this paragraph,
“electronic monitoring” means confinement of the
defendant within a specified location or locations
with supervision by means of an electronic device
approved by the Department of Corrections which is
designed to detect if the defendant is in the court-
ordered location at the required times and which
records violations for investigation by a qualified
supervisory agency or person,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 24
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

p. to perform one or more courses of treatment, education
or rehabilitation for any conditions, behaviors,
deficiencies or disorders which may contribute to
criminal conduct including but not limited to alcohol
and substance abuse, mental health, emotional health,
physical health, propensity for violence, antisocial
behavior, personality or attitudes, deviant sexual
behavior, child development, parenting assistance, job
skills, vocational-technical skills, domestic
relations, literacy, education or any other
identifiable deficiency which may be treated
appropriately in the community and for which a
certified provider or a program recognized by the
court as having significant positive impact exists in
the community. Any treatment, education or
rehabilitation provider required to be certified
pursuant to law or rule shall be certified by the
appropriate state agency or a national organization,
q. to submit to periodic testing for alcohol,
intoxicating substance or controlled dangerous
substances by a qualified laboratory,
r. to pay a fee or costs for treatment, education,
supervision, participation in a program or any

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 25
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

combination thereof as determined by the court, based
upon the defendant’s ability to pay the fees or costs,
s. to be supervised by a Department of Corrections
employee, a private supervision provider or other
person designated by the court,
t. to obtain positive behavior modeling by a trained
mentor,
u. to serve a term of confinement in a restrictive
housing facility available in the community,
v. to serve a term of confinement in the county jail at
night or during weekends pursuant to Section 991a-2 of
this title or for work release,
w. to obtain employment or participate in employment-
related activities,
x. to participate in mandatory day reporting to
facilities or persons for services, payments, duties
or person-to-person contacts as specified by the
court,
y. to pay day fines not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of
the net wages earned. For purposes of this paragraph,
“day fine” means the offender is ordered to pay an
amount calculated as a percentage of net daily wages
earned. The day fine shall be paid to the local
community sentencing system as reparation to the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 26
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

community. Day fines shall be used to support the
local system,
z. to submit to blood or saliva testing as required by
subsection I of this section,
aa. to repair or restore property damaged by the
defendant’s conduct, if the court determines the
defendant possesses sufficient skill to repair or
restore the property and the victim consents to the
repairing or restoring of the property,
bb. to restore damaged property in kind or payment of out-
of-pocket expenses to the victim, if the court is able
to determine the actual out-of-pocket expenses
suffered by the victim,
cc. to attend a victim-offender reconciliation program if
the victim agrees to participate and the offender is
deemed appropriate for participation,
dd. to prioritize payments for restitution to the victim,
ee. in the case of a person convicted of prostitution
pursuant to Section 1029 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, require such person to receive counseling
for the behavior which may have caused such person to
engage in prostitution activities. Such person may be
required to receive counseling in areas including but
not limited to alcohol and substance abuse, sexual
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 27
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

behavior problems or domestic abuse or child abuse
problems,
ff. in the case of a sex offender sentenced after November
1, 1989, and required by law to register pursuant to
the Sex Offender Registration Act, the court shall
require the person to comply with sex offender
specific rules and conditions of supervision
established by the Department of Corrections and
require the person to participate in a treatment
program designed for the treatment of sex offenders
during the period of time while the offender is
subject to supervision by the Department of
Corrections. The treatment program shall include
polygraph examinations specifically designed for use
with sex offenders for purposes of supervision and
treatment compliance, and shall be administered not
less than each six (6) months during the period of
supervision. The examination shall be administered by
a certified licensed polygraph examiner. The
treatment program must be approved by the Department
of Corrections or the Department of Mental Health and
Substance Abuse Services. Such treatment shall be at
the expense of the defendant based on the defendant’s
ability to pay,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 28
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

gg. in addition to other sentencing powers of the court,
the court in the case of a defendant being sentenced
for a felony conviction for a violation of Section 2-
402 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes which
involves marijuana may require the person to
participate in a drug court program, if available. If
a drug court program is not available, the defendant
may be required to participate in a community
sanctions program, if available,
hh. in the case of a person convicted of any false or
bogus check violation, as defined in Section 1541.4 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, impose a fee of
Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) to the victim for each
check, and impose a bogus check fee to be paid to the
district attorney. The bogus check fee paid to the
district attorney shall be equal to the amount
assessed as court costs plus Twenty-five Dollars
($25.00) for each check upon filing of the case in
district court. This money shall be deposited in the
Bogus Check Restitution Program Fund as established in
subsection B of Section 114 of this title.
Additionally, the court may require the offender to
pay restitution and bogus check fees on any other

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 29
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

bogus check or checks that have been submitted to the
Bogus Check Restitution Program, and
ii. any other provision specifically ordered by the court.
However, any such order for restitution, community service,
payment to a local certified crime stoppers program, payment to the
Oklahoma Reward System or confinement in the county jail, or a
combination thereof, shall be made in conjunction with probation and
shall be made a condition of the suspended sentence.
However, unless under the supervision of the district attorney,
the offender shall be required to pay Forty Dollars ($40.00) per
month to the district attorney during the first two (2) years of
probation to compensate the district attorney for the costs incurred
during the prosecution of the offender and for the additional work
of verifying the compliance of the offender with the rules and
conditions of his or her probation. The district attorney may waive
any part of this requirement in the best interests of justice. The
court shall not waive, suspend, defer or dismiss the costs of
prosecution in its entirety. However, if the court determines that
a reduction in the fine, costs and costs of prosecution is
warranted, the court shall equally apply the same percentage
reduction to the fine, costs and costs of prosecution owed by the
offender;
2. Impose a fine prescribed by law for the offense, with or
without probation or commitment and with or without restitution or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 30
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

serv ice as provided for in this section, Section 991a-4.1 of this
title or Section 227 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Commit such person for confinement provided for by law with
or without restitution as provided for in this section;
4. Order the defendant to reimburse the Oklahoma State Bureau
of Investigation for costs incurred by that agency during its
investigation of the crime for which the defendant pleaded guilty,
nolo contendere or was convicted including compensation for
laboratory, technical or investigation services performed by the
Bureau if, in the opinion of the court, the defendant is able to pay
without imposing manifest hardship on the defendant, and if the
costs incurred by the Bureau during the investigation of the
defendant’s case may be determined with reasonable certainty;
5. Order the defendant to reimburse the Oklahoma State Bureau
of Investigation for all costs incurred by that agency for cleaning
up an illegal drug laboratory site for which the defendant pleaded
guilty, nolo contendere or was convicted. The court clerk shall
collect the amount and may retain five percent (5%) of such monies
to be deposited in the Court Clerk’s Revolving Fund to cover
administrative costs and shall remit the remainder to the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Investigation to be deposited in the OSBI Revolving
Fund established by Section 150.19a of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 31
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. In the case of nonviolent felony offenses, sentence such
person to the Community Service Sentencing Program;
7. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court, in
the case of a person convicted of operating or being in control of a
motor vehicle while the person was under the influence of alcohol,
other intoxicating substance or a combination of alcohol or another
intoxicating substance, or convicted of operating a motor vehicle
while the ability of the person to operate such vehicle was impaired
due to the consumption of alcohol, require such person:
a. to participate in an alcohol and drug assessment and
evaluation by an assessment agency or assessment
personnel certified by the Department of Mental Health
and Substance Abuse Services pursuant to Section 3-460
of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes and, as
determined by the assessment, participate in an
alcohol and drug substance abuse course or treatment
program or both, pursuant to Sections 3-452 and 3-453
of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes,
b. to attend a victims impact panel program, as defined
in subsection H of this section, and to pay a fee of
Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) as set by the governing
authority of the program and approved by the court, to
the program to offset the cost of participation by the

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 32
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

defendant, if in the opinion of the court the
defendant has the ability to pay such fee,
c. to both participate in the alcohol and drug substance
abuse course or treatment program, pursuant to
subparagraph a of this paragraph and attend a victims
impact panel program, pursuant to subparagraph b of
this paragraph,
d. to install, at the expense of the person, an ignition
interlock device approved by the Board of Tests for
Alcohol and Drug Influence, upon every motor vehicle
operated by such person and to require that a notation
of this restriction be affixed to the person’s driver
license at the time of reinstatement of the license.
The restriction shall remain on the driver license for
such period as the court shall determine. The
restriction may be modified or removed by order of the
court and notice of the order shall be given to
Service Oklahoma. Upon the expiration of the period
for the restriction, Service Oklahoma shall remove the
restriction without further court order. Failure to
comply with the order to install an ignition interlock
device or operating any vehicle without such device
during the period of restriction shall be a violation

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 33
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of the sentence and may be punished as deemed proper
by the sentencing court, or
e. beginning January 1, 1993, to submit to electronically
monitored home detention administered and supervised
by the Department of Corrections, and to pay to the
Department a monitoring fee, not to exceed Seventy-
five Dollars ($75.00) a month, to the Department of
Corrections, if in the opinion of the court the
defendant has the ability to pay such fee. Any fees
collected pursuant to this subparagraph shall be
deposited in the Department of Corrections Revolving
Fund. Any order by the court for the payment of the
monitoring fee, if willfully disobeyed, may be
enforced as an indirect contempt of court;
8. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court, in
the case of a person convicted of prostitution pursuant to Section
1029 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, require such person to
receive counseling for the behavior which may have caused such
person to engage in prostitution activities. Such person may be
required to receive counseling in areas including but not limited to
alcohol and substance abuse, sexual behavior problems or domestic
abuse or child abuse problems;
9. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court, in
the case of a person convicted of any crime related to domestic
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 34
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

abus e, as defined in Section 60.1 of this title, the court may
require the defendant to undergo the treatment or participate in the
counseling services necessary to bring about the cessation of
domestic abuse against the victim. The defendant may be required to
pay all or part of the cost of the treatment or counseling services;
10. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court,
the court, in the case of a sex offender sentenced after November 1,
1989, and required by law to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders
Registration Act, shall require the defendant to participate in a
treatment program designed specifically for the treatment of sex
offenders, if available. The treatment program will include
polygraph examinations specifically designed for use with sex
offenders for the purpose of supervision and treatment compliance,
provided the examination is administered by a certified licensed
polygraph examiner. The treatment program must be approved by the
Department of Corrections or the Department of Mental Health and
Substance Abuse Services. Such treatment shall be at the expense of
the defendant based on the ability of the defendant to pay;
11. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court,
the court, in the case of a person convicted of abuse or neglect of
a child, as defined in Section 1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma
Statutes, may require the person to undergo treatment or to
participate in counseling services. The defendant may be required

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 35
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

to p ay all or part of the cost of the treatment or counseling
services;
12. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court,
the court, in the case of a person convicted of cruelty to animals
pursuant to Section 1685 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, may
require the person to pay restitution to animal facilities for
medical care and any boarding costs of victimized animals;
13. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court, a
sex offender who is habitual or aggravated as defined by Section 584
of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes and who is required to register
as a sex offender pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act
shall be supervised by the Department of Corrections for the
duration of the registration period and shall be assigned to a
global position monitoring device by the Department of Corrections
for the duration of the registration period. The cost of such
monitoring device shall be reimbursed by the offender;
14. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court, in
the case of a sex offender who is required by law to register
pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act, the court may
prohibit the person from accessing or using any Internet social
networking website that has the potential or likelihood of allowing
the sex offender to have contact with any child who is under the age
of eighteen (18) years;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 36
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

15. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court, in
the case of a sex offender who is required by law to register
pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act, the court shall
require the person to register any electronic mail address
information, instant message, chat or other Internet communication
name or identity information that the person uses or intends to use
while accessing the Internet or used for other purposes of social
networking or other similar Internet communication; or
16. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court,
and pursuant to the terms and conditions of a written plea
agreement, the court may prohibit the defendant from entering,
visiting or residing within the judicial district in which the
defendant was convicted until after completion of his or her
sentence; provided, however, the court shall ensure that the
defendant has access to those services or programs for which the
defendant is required to participate as a condition of probation.
When seeking to enter the prohibited judicial district for personal
business not related to his or her criminal case, the defendant
shall be required to obtain approval by the court.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who
is found guilty of a violation of any provision of Section 761 or
11-902 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes or any person pleading
guilty or nolo contendere for a violation of any provision of such
sections shall be ordered to participate in, prior to sentencing, an
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 37
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

alco hol and drug assessment and evaluation by an assessment agency
or assessment personnel certified by the Department of Mental Health
and Substance Abuse Services for the purpose of evaluating the
receptivity to treatment and prognosis of the person. The court
shall order the person to reimburse the agency or assessor for the
evaluation. The fee shall be the amount provided in subsection C of
Section 3-460 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes. The evaluation
shall be conducted at a certified assessment agency, the office of a
certified assessor or at another location as ordered by the court.
The agency or assessor shall, within seventy-two (72) hours from the
time the person is assessed, submit a written report to the court
for the purpose of assisting the court in its final sentencing
determination. No person, agency or facility operating an alcohol
and drug substance abuse evaluation program certified by the
Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services shall
solicit or refer any person evaluated pursuant to this subsection
for any treatment program or alcohol and drug substance abuse
service in which such person, agency or facility has a vested
interest; however, this provision shall not be construed to prohibit
the court from ordering participation in or any person from
voluntarily utilizing a treatment program or alcohol and drug
substance abuse service offered by such person, agency or facility.
If a person is sentenced to the custody of the Department of
Corrections and the court has received a written evaluation report
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 38
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

purs uant to this subsection, the report shall be furnished to the
Department of Corrections with the judgment and sentence. Any
evaluation report submitted to the court pursuant to this subsection
shall be handled in a manner which will keep such report
confidential from the general public’s review. Nothing contained in
this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the court from
ordering judgment and sentence in the event the defendant fails or
refuses to comply with an order of the court to obtain the
evaluation required by this subsection.
C. When sentencing a person convicted of a crime, the court
shall first consider a program of restitution for the victim, as
well as imposition of a fine or incarceration of the offender. The
provisions of paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section shall not
apply to defendants being sentenced upon their third or subsequent
to their third conviction of a felony. Provided, the court may
waive these prohibitions upon written application of the district
attorney. Both the application and the waiver shall be made part of
the record of the case.
D. When sentencing a person convicted of a crime, the judge
shall consider any victim impact statements if submitted to the
jury, or the judge in the event a jury is waived.
E. Probation, for purposes of subsection A of this section, is
a procedure by which a defendant found guilty of a crime, whether
upon a verdict or plea of guilty or upon a plea of nolo contendere,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 39
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

is r eleased by the court subject to conditions imposed by the court
and subject to supervision by the Department of Corrections, a
private supervision provider or other person designated by the
court. Such supervision shall be initiated upon an order of
probation from the court, and shall not exceed two (2) years, unless
a petition alleging a violation of any condition of deferred
judgment or seeking revocation of the suspended sentence is filed
during the supervision, or as otherwise provided by law. In the
case of a person convicted of a sex offense, supervision shall begin
immediately upon release from incarceration or if parole is granted
and shall not be limited to two (2) years. Provided further, any
supervision provided for in this section may be extended for a
period not to exceed the expiration of the maximum term or terms of
the sentence upon a determination by the court or the Division of
Probation and Parole of the Department of Corrections that the best
interests of the public and the release will be served by an
extended period of supervision.
F. The Department of Corrections, or such other agency as the
court may designate, shall be responsible for the monitoring and
administration of the restitution and service programs provided for
by subparagraphs a, c and d of paragraph 1 of subsection A of this
section, and shall ensure that restitution payments are forwarded to
the victim and that service assignments are properly performed.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 40
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

G. 1. The Department of Corrections is hereby authorized,
subject to funds available through appropriation by the Legislature,
to contract with counties for the administration of county Community
Service Sentencing Programs.
2. Any offender eligible to participate in the Program pursuant
to this section shall be eligible to participate in a county
Program; provided, participation in county-funded Programs shall not
be limited to offenders who would otherwise be sentenced to
confinement with the Department of Corrections.
3. The Department shall establish criteria and specifications
for contracts with counties for such Programs. A county may apply
to the Department for a contract for a county-funded Program for a
specific period of time. The Department shall be responsible for
ensuring that any contracting county complies in full with
specifications and requirements of the contract. The contract shall
set appropriate compensation to the county for services to the
Department.
4. The Department is hereby authorized to provide technical
assistance to any county in establishing a Program, regardless of
whether the county enters into a contract pursuant to this
subsection. Technical assistance shall include appropriate
staffing, development of community resources, sponsorship,
supervision and any other requirements.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 41
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

5. The Department shall annually make a report to the Governor,
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House
on the number of such Programs, the number of participating
offenders, the success rates of each Program according to criteria
established by the Department and the costs of each Program.
H. As used in this section:
1. “Ignition interlock device” means a device that, without
tampering or intervention by another person, would prevent the
defendant from operating a motor vehicle if the defendant has a
blood or breath alcohol concentration of two-hundredths (0.02) or
greater;
2. “Electronically monitored home detention” means
incarceration of the defendant within a specified location or
locations with monitoring by means of a device approved by the
Department of Corrections that detects if the person leaves the
confines of any specified location; and
3. “Victims impact panel program” means a program conducted by
a corporation registered with the Secretary of State in Oklahoma for
the sole purpose of operating a victims impact panel program. The
program shall include live presentations from presenters who will
share personal stories with participants about how alcohol, drug
abuse, the operation of a motor vehicle while using an electronic
communication device or the illegal conduct of others has personally
impacted the lives of the presenters. A victims impact panel
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 42
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prog ram shall be attended by persons who have committed the offense
of driving, operating or being in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or other intoxicating
substance, operating a motor vehicle while the ability of the person
to operate such vehicle was impaired due to the consumption of
alcohol or any other substance or operating a motor vehicle while
using an electronic device or by persons who have been convicted of
furnishing alcoholic beverage to persons under twenty-one (21) years
of age, as provided in Sections 6-101 and 6-120 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes. Persons attending a victims impact panel program
shall be required to pay a fee of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) to
the provider of the program. A certificate of completion shall be
issued to the person upon satisfying the attendance and fee
requirements of the victims impact panel program. The certificate
of completion shall contain the business identification number of
the program provider. A certified assessment agency, certified
assessor or provider of an alcohol and drug substance abuse course
shall be prohibited from providing a victims impact panel program
and shall further be prohibited from having any proprietary or
pecuniary interest in a victims impact panel program. The provider
of the victims impact panel program shall carry general liability
insurance and maintain an accurate accounting of all business
transactions and funds received in relation to the victims impact
panel program. Beginning October 1, 2020, and each October 1
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 43
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

ther eafter, the provider of the victims impact panel program shall
provide to the District Attorneys Council the following:
a. proof of registration with the Oklahoma Secretary of
State,
b. proof of general liability insurance,
c. end-of-year financial statements prepared by a
certified public accountant,
d. a copy of federal income tax returns filed with the
Internal Revenue Service,
e. a registration fee of One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00). The registration fee shall be deposited
in the District Attorneys Council Revolving Fund
created in Section 215.28 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
f. a statement certifying that the provider of the
victims impact panel program has complied with all of
the requirements set forth in this paragraph.
I. A person convicted of a felony offense or receiving any form
of probation for an offense in which registration is required
pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act, shall submit to
deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing for law enforcement
identification purposes in accordance with Section 150.27 of Title
74 of the Oklahoma Statutes and the rules promulgated by the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation for the OSBI Combined DNA
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 44
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Inde x System (CODIS) Database. Subject to the availability of
funds, any person convicted of a misdemeanor offense of assault and
battery, domestic abuse, stalking, possession of a controlled
substance prohibited under the Uniform Controlled Dangerous
Substances Act, outraging public decency, resisting arrest, escape
or attempting to escape, eluding a police officer, Peeping Tom,
pointing a firearm, threatening an act of violence, breaking and
entering a dwelling place, destruction of property, negligent
homicide or causing a personal injury accident while driving under
the influence of any intoxicating substance, or any alien unlawfully
present under federal immigration law, upon arrest, shall submit to
DNA testing for law enforcement identification purposes in
accordance with Section 150.27 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes
and the rules promulgated by the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation for the OSBI Combined DNA Index System (CODIS)
Database. Any defendant sentenced to probation shall be required to
submit to testing within thirty (30) days of sentencing either to
the Department of Corrections or to the county sheriff or other
peace officer as directed by the court. Defendants who are
sentenced to a term of incarceration shall submit to testing in
accordance with Section 530.1 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
for those defendants who enter the custody of the Department of
Corrections or to the county sheriff, for those defendants sentenced
to incarceration in a county jail. Convicted individuals who have
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 45
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prev iously submitted to DNA testing under this section and for whom
a valid sample is on file in the OSBI Combined DNA Index System
(CODIS) Database at the time of sentencing shall not be required to
submit to additional testing. Except as required by the Sex
Offenders Registration Act, a deferred judgment does not require
submission to DNA testing.
Any person who is incarcerated in the custody of the Department
of Corrections after July 1, 1996, and who has not been released
before January 1, 2006, shall provide a blood or saliva sample prior
to release. Every person subject to DNA testing after January 1,
2006, whose sentence does not include a term of confinement with the
Department of Corrections shall submit a blood or saliva sample.
Every person subject to DNA testing who is sentenced to unsupervised
probation or otherwise not supervised by the Department of
Corrections shall submit for blood or saliva testing to the sheriff
of the sentencing county.
J. Samples of blood or saliva for DNA testing required by
subsection I of this section shall be taken by employees or
contractors of the Department of Corrections, peace officers, or the
county sheriff or employees or contractors of the sheriff’s office.
The individuals shall be properly trained to collect blood or saliva
samples. Persons collecting blood or saliva for DNA testing
pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil liabilities
arising from this activity. All collectors of DNA samples shall
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 46
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

ensu re the collection of samples are mailed to the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation within ten (10) days of the time the subject
appears for testing or within ten (10) days of the date the subject
comes into physical custody to serve a term of incarceration. All
collectors of DNA samples shall use sample kits provided by the OSBI
and procedures promulgated by the OSBI. Persons subject to DNA
testing who are not received at the Lexington Assessment and
Reception Center shall be required to pay a fee of Fifteen Dollars
($15.00) to the agency collecting the sample for submission to the
OSBI Combined DNA Index System (CODIS) Database. Any fees collected
pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the revolving
account or the service fee account of the collection agency or
department.
K. When sentencing a person who has been convicted of a crime
that would subject that person to the provisions of the Sex
Offenders Registration Act, neither the court nor the district
attorney shall be allowed to waive or exempt such person from the
registration requirements of the Sex Offenders Registration Act.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
February 17, 2026 - DO PASS




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1540 SFLR Page 47
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)